Hawaii statutes.
[§11-360] Contributions to a party.
(a) No person shall make contributions to a party in an aggregate amount
greater than $25,000 in any two-year election period, except as provided in
subsection (b).

(b) No political committee established and
maintained by a national political party shall make contributions to a party in
an aggregate amount greater than $50,000 in any two-year election period.

(c) If a person makes a contribution to a
party that is earmarked for a candidate or candidates, the contribution shall
be deemed to be a contribution from both the original contributor and the party
distributing such funds to a candidate or candidates. The earmarked funds
shall be promptly distributed by the party to the candidate.

(d) This section shall not prohibit a
candidate from making contributions to the candidate's party if contributions
are not earmarked for another candidate. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next